Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4621
Act; enforcement.

The Attorney General or any county attorney may institute an action in the name of the State of Nebraska for an injunction or other process to restrain or prevent any violation of the 340B Contract Pharmacy Protection Act.

Laws 2025, LB168, § 4.